Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska90-119
Governor; designate official state items.

The Governor may designate official state items, including animals, plants, minerals, and other things. Legislative approval of any such designation is not required. Any designation made on or prior to September 13, 1997, is not affected by this section.

Laws 1997, LB 106, § 1.